suomimalaga/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_s
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiruitse:kiiruitse LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiruimmiten:kiiruimmiten LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiruimmittan:kiiruimmittain LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiruisammin:kiiruisammin LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiirus:kiirus LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiirusasti:kiirusasti LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]kiiru[X]kiirusilla:kiirusilla LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]käännyksissä[X]käännyksissä:käännyksissä Loppu ;
[Ls][Xp]käännyksissä[X]käännyksiin:käännyksiin   Loppu ;
[Ls][Xp]miten[X]mitenkäs:mitenkäs     Liitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]miten[X]mitenkäspä:mitenkäspä Liitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]niin[X]niin[Bm]kuin:niinkuin Liitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]niinkuin[X]niin[Bm]kuin:niinkuin Liitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]paitahihasillaan[X]paita[Bm]hihasilla:paitahihasilla Omistusliite_a ;
[Ls][Xp]paitahihasillaan[X]paita[Bm]hihasilla:paitahihasilla Liitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]sensijaan[X]sen[Bm]sijaan:sensijaan Liitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]sentähden[X]sen[Bm]tähden:sentähden Liitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]senvuoksi[X]sen[Bm]vuoksi:senvuoksi Liitesana_a ;
[Ls][Xp]väännyksissä[X]väännyksissä:väännyksissä OlV_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]väännyksissä[X]väännyksissä:väännyksissä Loppu ;
[Ls][Xp]väännyksissä[X]väännyksiin:väännyksiin   Loppu ;
[Ls][Xp]väännyksissä[X]väännyksihin:väännyksihin Loppu ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt'[Bm]ympäri:ylt'ympäri LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt'[Bm]ympäriinsä:ylt'ympäriinsä LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt'[Bm]ympärinsä:ylt'ympärinsä LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt'[Bm]ympäri:ylt'ympäri Ulkopaikallissijat_Yks_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt'ympäritse:ylt'ympäritse LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt[Bm]ympäri:yltympäri Ulkopaikallissijat_Yks_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]yltympäri[X]ylt[Bm]ympärinsä:yltympärinsä LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ylöspäin[X]ylähältäkin[Bm]päin:ylähältäkinpäin Loppu_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ylöspäin[X]ylähältäkään[Bm]päin:ylähältäkäänpäin Loppu_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ylöspäin[X]ylähältä[Bm]päin:ylähältäpäin LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ympäri[X]ympäri:ympäri Ulkopaikallissijat_Yks_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ympäri[X]ympäritse:ympäritse LoppuLiitesana_ä ;
[Ls][Xp]ympäri[X]ympäritse:ympäritse Omistusliite_ä ;
